en: hop extract
bg: екстракт от хмел
cs: chmelový ekstrakt
da: humle-ekstrakt
de: Hopfenextrakt
es: extracto de lupulo
fi: humalauute, humalauutteet
fr: extrait de houblon, extraits de houblon
it: estratto di luppolo
nl: hopextract
pl: ekstrakt z chmielu
pt: extrato de lupolo, extracto de lupolo
sk: chmelovy extract

en: hops flavour
it: aroma di luppolo
pl: aromat chmielu

en: natural hops flavour
pl: naturalny aromat chmielu

en: natural hop, natural hops
de: Natur Hopfen, Natur-Hopfen

en: organic hops
bg: био хмел
de: biologische Hopfen, bio Hopfen
es: lúpulo bio
fi: luomuhumala, luomu humala
fr: houblon bio
hr: organski hmelj
it: luppolo biologico, luppolo bio
nl: biologische hop, bio hop
sv: organisk humle

en: hop oil
de: Hopfenöl
fi: humalaöljy
hr: ulje od hmelja
it: olio di luppolo
sv: humleolja

en: processed hops
hr: prerađeni hmelj
it: luppoli lavorati

en: hop preparation
hr: pripravak od hmelja
it: preparazione del luppolo

en: jasmine petals
fr: pétales de jasmin
it: petali di gelsomino

en: juniper
ar: عرعر شائع
az: adi ardıc
ba: артыш
be: ядловец звычайны
bg: обикновена хвойна
br: jenevreg-boutin
bs: smreka
ca: ginebre comú
co: ghjinepara
cs: jalovec obecný
cv: уртăш йывăççи
cy: merywen
da: enebærbusk, almindelig ene
de: Wacholder, Wachholder, Gemeiner Wacholder
el: άρκευθος
eo: ordinara junipero
es: enebro, enebro común
et: kadakas, harilik kadakas
eu: ipar-ipuru
fa: پیرو
fi: kataja
fo: baraldur
fr: genièvre, genévrier commun
ga: aiteal
gl: xenebreiro
he: ערער מצוי
hr: obična borovica, borovica
hu: közönséges boróka
hy: գիհի ցածրաաճ
is: einir
it: ginepro
ja: セイヨウネズ
ka: ჩვეულებრივი ღვია
kl: kakillarnaq
ko: 두송
la: Juniperus communis
lb: Wakelter
lt: paprastasis kadagys
lv: parastais kadiķis
mk: обична смрека
nb: einerbusk, einebusk, einer
nl: jeneverbes
nn: einebusk, einerbusk, eine
os: хуымæтæджы æхсæлы
pl: jałowiec, jałowca, jałowcowy, jałowcowa, jałowcowe, jałowiec pospolity
pt: zimbro, zimbro-rasteiro
rm: ginaiver cumin
ro: ienupăr
ru: можжевельник обыкновенный
se: reatká
sh: kleka
sk: borievka obyčajná
sl: navadni brin
sq: dëllinja
sr: клека
su: juniper beri
sv: enbuske
tr: adi ardıç
tt: артыш
uk: ялівець звичайний
wa: franc pectî
zh: 刺柏

en: juniper berry, juniper berries
af: jenewerbessie
ar: توت العرعر
be: ядловец
br: jenevra
bs: juniper
ca: ginebró
cs: jalovčinka
da: enebær
de: Wacholderbeere, Wacholderbeeren
es: baya de enebro, bayas de enebro
et: marikäbi
fa: جونیپر بری
fi: katajanmarja, katajanmarjat
fr: baies de genièvre, baies de genévrier
hr: bobica kleke, bobice kleke
hu: borókabogyó
hy: գիհու հատապտուղ
id: juniper beri
it: coccola di ginepro
ja: 杜松果
jv: bèri juniper
ko: 두송자
la: Juniperi pseudo-fructus
lt: kadagio uogos
lv: čiekuroga
mk: смрекинка
ml: ജൂനിപ്പർ കായ
mt: frotta tal-ġnibru
nb: einebær, einerbær
nl: bessen van de jeneverbes, jeneverbessen
nn: einebær, einerbær
pl: owoc jałowca, owoce jałowca
pt: semente de zimbro, baga de zimbro
ro: boabă de ienupăr
ru: можжевельник
sl: brinova jagoda
sv: enbär
tw: juniper nnuaba a wɔfrɛ no berry
uk: ялівець
uz: archa mevasi
vi: bách xù
zh: 杜松子

en: lavender
ar: ضرم
az: Lavanda
be: Лаванда
bg: Лавандула
bn: ল্যাভেন্ডার
bo: དྲི་ཞིམ་ཅན།
br: Lavand
bs: Lavanda
cs: levandule
cy: Lafant
da: Lavendel
de: Lavendel
el: Λεβάντα
eo: Lavendo
es: Lavanda
et: Lavendel
eu: Labanda
fa: لاواندولا
fi: laventeli, laventelit
fr: lavande
fy: Lavindel
gl: Lavanda
he: אזוביון
hr: lavande
hu: levendula
hy: Նարդոս
id: Lavender
io: Lavendo
is: Lofnarblóm
it: lavanda
ja: ラベンダー
jv: Lavender
ka: ლავანდი
kk: Лаванда
ko: 라벤더속
la: Lavandula
lb: Lavendel
lt: Levanda
lv: lavandas
mk: Лаванда
ml: ജടാമാഞ്ചി
my: လဗင်ဒါပင်
nb: Lavendelslekta
nl: lavendel
oc: Lavanda
pl: Lawenda, lawendy, lawendowa, lawendowe, lawendowy
pt: Lavanda
ro: Levantă
ru: Лаванда
sd: لاوھينڊر
sh: Lavande
sk: levanduľa
sl: Sivka
sv: Lavendelsläktet
th: ลาเวนเดอร์
tr: Lavanta
tt: Ләвән
uk: Лаванда
zh: 薰衣草

en: lavender flower, lavender flowers
da: lavendelblomst
de: lavendelblüten
es: flor de lavanda
fi: laventelinkukka
fr: fleurs de lavande
hr: cvijet lavande
it: fiore di lavanda
nb: lavendelblomst
nl: lavendelbloem
sv: lavendelblomma

en: lemon balm
af: Suurlemoenbalsem
ar: ترنجان مخزني
az: Dərman limonotu
ba: Мелисса
be: Меліса лекавая
bg: маточина
bs: Matičnjak
ca: melissa
cs: meduňka lékařská
cy: Balm
da: Citron-Melisse
de: Zitronenmelisse, Melisse
el: Μελισσόχορτο
eo: Citronmeliso
es: Toronjil, melisa
et: Sidrunmeliss
eu: Garraiska
fa: بادرنجبویه
fi: Sitruunamelissa
fr: mélisse
gl: Melisa
hr: matičnjak, matičnjaka, melissa officinalis l
hu: citromfű
hy: Պատրինջ դեղատու
is: Sítrónumelissa
it: melissa
ja: レモンバーム
ka: ბარამბო
kk: Дәрілік мелисса
ko: 레몬밤
la: Melissa officinalis
lt: Vaistinė melisa
lv: Citronmētra
mk: маточина
nb: Sitronmelisse
nl: citroenmelisse, melisse, citroen melisse
nn: Sitronmelisse
pl: melisa, melisa lekarska, melissa officinalis, ziele melisy
ps: ليمو ويلنی
pt: Erva-cidreira
ro: Roiniță
ru: Мелисса лекарственная
sh: Matičnjak
sk: medovka lekárska
sl: Navadna melisa
sr: матичњак
sv: Citronmeliss
th: สะระแหน่
uk: Меліса лікарська
vi: Tía tô đất
zh: 蜜蜂花

en: organic lemon balm
fi: luomu sitruunamelissa
fr: mélisse bio
hr: organski matičnjak
it: melissa biologica

en: lemon beebrush, lemon verbena
de: Zitronenverbene
es: hierba luisa, cedrón, verbena de Indias
hr: četkica od limuna
la: aloysia citrodora

en: linden
de: Lindenblüten
es: Tila
fi: lehmus
fr: tilleul, fleurs de tilleul
hr: lipa, cvijet lipe, Tilia officinarum L
it: Fiori di tiglio
nl: Linde, lindebloesem

en: maca
xx: maca
ba: ҡандалагөл
de: Maca
el: μάκα
ja: マカ
ko: 마카
qu: maka
zh: 印加萝卜

en: black maca root
es: raíz de maca negra
fr: racine de maca noire
hr: korijena crne mace
it: radice di maca nera
nl: zwarte maca wortel
pt: raiz de maca preta

en: lepidium meyenii
xx: lepidium meyenii
fi: andienkrassi